Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1874.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.165, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Use of commercial motor vehicle in certain offenses; disqualification for life. new text end new text begin The commissioner must disqualify a person from operating a commercial motor vehicle for life if the person uses a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of the following offenses: new text end new text begin (1) a felony violation involving the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance, or possession with the intent to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance under chapter 152; or new text end new text begin (2) a felony violation involving a forced or coerced labor or services or human trafficking-related offense under section 609.281, subdivision 4; 609.282; or 609.322, subdivision 1 or 1a. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to offenses committed on or after that date. new text end